Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF578.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1636SV (2) 91 sb/js S.F. 578 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 357A.26 Financial records access. 1 A rural water district or rural water association 2 incorporated under this chapter or chapter 504 shall, 3 upon reasonable request by any member of the district 4 or association, provide to the member the districtâs 5 or associationâs most recent biennial report and any 6 requested financial information, including the districtâs 7 or associationâs budget and balance sheet. The requested 8 information shall be delivered to the member no later than 9 thirty days after the request. 10 Sec. 2. NEW SECTION . 498.38 Financial records access. 11 An association that provides utility service to its 12 members shall, upon reasonable request by any member of the 13 association, provide to the member the associationâs most 14 recent biennial report and any requested financial information, 15 including the associationâs budget and balance sheet. The 16 requested information shall be delivered to the member no later 17 than thirty days after the request. 18 Sec. 3. NEW SECTION . 499.81 Financial records access. 19 An association that provides utility service to its 20 members shall, upon reasonable request by any member of the 21 association, provide to the member the associationâs most 22 recent biennial report and any requested financial information, 23 including the associationâs budget and balance sheet. The 24 requested information shall be delivered to the member no later 25 than thirty days after the request. 26